lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1979 Y 1
SFX 1979 0 foot .
SFX 2731 Y 1
SFX 2731 0 position's .
SFX 2204 Y 1
SFX 2204 0 icalness .
SFX 1384 Y 1
SFX 1384 0 st's .
SFX 3946 Y 1
SFX 3946 0 mission's .
SFX 3769 Y 1
SFX 3769 0 s-in-law .
SFX 977 Y 1
SFX 977 0 bag .
SFX 1622 Y 1
SFX 1622 0 bar .
SFX 1387 Y 1
SFX 1387 0 sions .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 ance .
SFX 1626 Y 1
SFX 1626 0 ancy .
SFX 1314 Y 1
SFX 1314 0 lists .
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 0 bed .
SFX 4280 Y 1
SFX 4280 0 bee .
SFX 1502 Y 1
SFX 1502 0 bel .
SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 0 ber .
SFX 2953 Y 1
SFX 2953 0 bes .
SFX 1682 Y 1
SFX 1682 0 que's .
SFX 2282 Y 1
SFX 2282 0 yer's .
SFX 1500 Y 1
SFX 1500 0 bie .
SFX 4275 Y 1
SFX 4275 0 bin .
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 0 tone's .
SFX 3537 Y 1
SFX 3537 0 bit .
SFX 4588 Y 1
SFX 4588 0 singly .
SFX 4221 Y 1
SFX 4221 0 eaux .
SFX 4816 Y 1
SFX 4816 0 ologic .
SFX 4268 Y 1
SFX 4268 0 bos .
SFX 823 Y 1
SFX 823 0 box .
SFX 1102 Y 1
SFX 1102 0 boy .
SFX 978 Y 1
SFX 978 0 atively .
SFX 3756 Y 1
SFX 3756 0 self .
SFX 1165 Y 1
SFX 1165 0 fullest .
SFX 3154 Y 1
SFX 3154 0 sels .
SFX 2223 Y 1
SFX 2223 0 fire's .
SFX 2689 Y 1
SFX 2689 0 sely .
SFX 4622 Y 1
SFX 4622 0 sent .
SFX 1194 Y 1
SFX 1194 0 tail's .
SFX 2251 Y 1
SFX 2251 0 bug .
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 0 sers .
SFX 1269 Y 1
SFX 1269 0 -headed .
SFX 855 Y 1
SFX 855 0 ibility's .
SFX 1294 Y 1
SFX 1294 0 sets .
SFX 1431 Y 1
SFX 1431 0 me's .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 lina's .
SFX 4731 Y 1
SFX 4731 0 raction's .
SFX 4224 Y 1
SFX 4224 0 dora .
SFX 3386 Y 1
SFX 3386 0 icide's .
SFX 4260 Y 1
SFX 4260 0 cale .
SFX 1544 Y 1
SFX 1544 0 orts .
SFX 1305 Y 1
SFX 1305 0 ologist's .
SFX 3012 Y 1
SFX 3012 0 -eighth .
SFX 3378 Y 1
SFX 3378 0 ifiable .
SFX 2459 Y 1
SFX 2459 0 ir's .
SFX 4259 Y 1
SFX 4259 0 cans .
SFX 2531 Y 1
SFX 2531 0 entially .
SFX 1797 Y 1
SFX 1797 0 caps .
SFX 864 Y 1
SFX 864 0 boat .
SFX 3524 Y 1
SFX 3524 0 card .
SFX 4258 Y 1
SFX 4258 0 care .
SFX 3523 Y 1
SFX 3523 0 cars .
SFX 3522 Y 1
SFX 3522 0 cart .
SFX 4956 Y 1
SFX 4956 0 location's .
SFX 2941 Y 1
SFX 2941 0 cats .
SFX 631 Y 1
SFX 631 0 alise .
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 0 alism .
SFX 1926 Y 1
SFX 1926 0 lations .
SFX 677 Y 1
SFX 677 0 alist .
SFX 2410 Y 1
SFX 2410 0 nard's .
SFX 2033 Y 1
SFX 2033 0 atically .
SFX 1652 Y 1
SFX 1652 0 thing .
SFX 3011 Y 1
SFX 3011 0 -eighths .
SFX 2699 Y 1
SFX 2699 0 ryman .
SFX 3970 Y 1
SFX 3970 0 low's .
SFX 3490 Y 1
SFX 3490 0 dress .
SFX 3771 Y 1
SFX 3771 0 rymen .
SFX 3437 Y 1
SFX 3437 0 footed .
SFX 4570 Y 1
SFX 4570 0 spread .
SFX 2867 Y 1
SFX 2867 0 icle .
SFX 4957 Y 1
SFX 4957 0 location .
SFX 564 Y 1
SFX 564 0 book .
SFX 3123 Y 1
SFX 3123 0 steps .
SFX 2595 Y 1
SFX 2595 0 wort's .
SFX 1062 Y 1
SFX 1062 0 ot's .
SFX 3725 Y 1
SFX 3725 0 soever .
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 0 sters .
SFX 1228 Y 1
SFX 1228 0 keeper .
SFX 4927 Y 1
SFX 4927 0 mering .
SFX 3762 Y 1
SFX 3762 0 scapes .
SFX 4561 Y 1
SFX 4561 0 stad .
SFX 2670 Y 1
SFX 2670 0 stan .
SFX 4834 Y 1
SFX 4834 0 ocating .
SFX 1573 Y 1
SFX 1573 0 lisation .
SFX 1178 Y 1
SFX 1178 0 boys .
SFX 2350 Y 1
SFX 2350 0 sdale .
SFX 3833 Y 1
SFX 3833 0 plier .
SFX 1382 Y 1
SFX 1382 0 sted .
SFX 3124 Y 1
SFX 3124 0 step .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 ster .
SFX 896 Y 1
SFX 896 0 ologies .
SFX 2358 Y 1
SFX 2358 0 rick's .
SFX 3584 Y 1
SFX 3584 0 wheel's .
SFX 1944 Y 1
SFX 1944 0 ino's .
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 -out .
SFX 1973 Y 1
SFX 1973 0 handed .
SFX 4791 Y 1
SFX 4791 0 orate's .
SFX 4754 Y 1
SFX 4754 0 peting .
SFX 1053 Y 1
SFX 1053 0 ston .
SFX 4552 Y 1
SFX 4552 0 stop .
SFX 3534 Y 1
SFX 3534 0 borne .
SFX 4427 Y 1
SFX 4427 0 uary's .
SFX 1137 Y 1
SFX 1137 0 ologist .
SFX 61 Y 1
SFX 61 0 ie's .
SFX 3903 Y 1
SFX 3903 0 nisation .
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 0 ification's .
SFX 488 Y 1
SFX 488 0 th's .
SFX 3117 Y 1
SFX 3117 0 tailed .
SFX 3295 Y 1
SFX 3295 0 mead .
SFX 3954 Y 1
SFX 3954 0 meal .
SFX 3461 Y 1
SFX 3461 0 erness .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 er's .
SFX 2530 Y 1
SFX 2530 0 eon's .
SFX 2935 Y 1
SFX 2935 0 ctions .
SFX 4847 Y 1
SFX 4847 0 nson .
SFX 3100 Y 1
SFX 3100 0 teen's .
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76 0 s's .
SFX 1629 Y 1
SFX 1629 0 aches .
SFX 3356 Y 1
SFX 3356 0 ired .
SFX 2846 Y 1
SFX 2846 0 ires .
SFX 3240 Y 1
SFX 3240 0 orizing .
SFX 403 Y 1
SFX 403 0 dness .
SFX 4829 Y 1
SFX 4829 0 og's .
SFX 4903 Y 1
SFX 4903 0 nates .
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 0 mest .
SFX 2508 Y 1
SFX 2508 0 fying .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 house .
SFX 1810 Y 1
SFX 1810 0 -in-law .
SFX 3571 Y 1
SFX 3571 0 -box .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 overs .
SFX 792 Y 1
SFX 792 0 dle .
SFX 3004 Y 1
SFX 3004 0 -four .
SFX 211 Y 1
SFX 211 0 dly .
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 0 ects .
SFX 4046 Y 1
SFX 4046 0 ivation .
SFX 3955 Y 1
SFX 3955 0 mating .
SFX 1868 Y 1
SFX 1868 0 rina's .
SFX 2542 Y 1
SFX 2542 0 dable .
SFX 3236 Y 1
SFX 3236 0 oted .
SFX 3235 Y 1
SFX 3235 0 otes .
SFX 2513 Y 1
SFX 2513 0 faced .
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 0 field .
SFX 2904 Y 1
SFX 2904 0 faces .
SFX 1613 Y 1
SFX 1613 0 dra .
SFX 3025 Y 1
SFX 3025 0 wheel .
SFX 4774 Y 1
SFX 4774 0 otic .
SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 0 ton's .
SFX 3493 Y 1
SFX 3493 0 dlers .
SFX 2741 Y 1
SFX 2741 0 ositions .
SFX 4633 Y 1
SFX 4633 0 scape's .
SFX 2499 Y 1
SFX 2499 0 graph .
SFX 2543 Y 1
SFX 2543 0 coat's .
SFX 1499 Y 1
SFX 1499 0 bie's .
SFX 2481 Y 1
SFX 2481 0 icles .
SFX 2468 Y 1
SFX 2468 0 ington's .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 kers .
SFX 2829 Y 1
SFX 2829 0 kets .
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 ee's .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0 ments .
SFX 2616 Y 1
SFX 2616 0 uit's .
SFX 4777 Y 1
SFX 4777 0 oser's .
SFX 628 Y 1
SFX 628 0 ber's .
SFX 3033 Y 1
SFX 3033 0 ventions .
SFX 3906 Y 1
SFX 3906 0 ngton's .
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 ically .
SFX 4592 Y 1
SFX 4592 0 sided .
SFX 3144 Y 1
SFX 3144 0 sider .
SFX 807 Y 1
SFX 807 0 sides .
SFX 550 Y 1
SFX 550 0 field's .
SFX 867 Y 1
SFX 867 0 ar's .
SFX 4780 Y 1
SFX 4780 0 ort's .
SFX 1093 Y 1
SFX 1093 0 f's .
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209 0 guard's .
SFX 2232 Y 1
SFX 2232 0 eral .
SFX 3677 Y 1
SFX 3677 0 thed .
SFX 2080 Y 1
SFX 2080 0 ther .
SFX 4501 Y 1
SFX 4501 0 thes .
SFX 3669 Y 1
SFX 3669 0 tilities .
SFX 3759 Y 1
SFX 3759 0 scripts .
SFX 4482 Y 1
SFX 4482 0 tionally .
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 ered .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 erer .
SFX 4640 Y 1
SFX 4640 0 sable .
SFX 2272 Y 1
SFX 2272 0 ache .
SFX 1442 Y 1
SFX 1442 0 itudes .
SFX 1861 Y 1
SFX 1861 0 saw .
SFX 3764 Y 1
SFX 3764 0 say .
SFX 4193 Y 1
SFX 4193 0 eria .
SFX 1012 Y 1
SFX 1012 0 lling .
SFX 4192 Y 1
SFX 4192 0 erie .
SFX 3645 Y 1
SFX 3645 0 types .
SFX 3023 Y 1
SFX 3023 0 wide .
SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 0 ishness .
SFX 4323 Y 1
SFX 4323 0 acle .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 sed .
SFX 4624 Y 1
SFX 4624 0 see .
SFX 2349 Y 1
SFX 2349 0 sel .
SFX 1295 Y 1
SFX 1295 0 sen .
SFX 540 Y 1
SFX 540 0 ser .
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 0 ses .
SFX 1201 Y 1
SFX 1201 0 set .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 iest .
SFX 1859 Y 1
SFX 1859 0 sey .
SFX 2326 Y 1
SFX 2326 0 tel's .
SFX 4306 Y 1
SFX 4306 0 anisation .
SFX 3818 Y 1
SFX 3818 0 ralization's .
SFX 2101 Y 1
SFX 2101 0 sia .
SFX 1056 Y 1
SFX 1056 0 sie .
SFX 2100 Y 1
SFX 2100 0 sig .
SFX 3733 Y 1
SFX 3733 0 sis .
SFX 1105 Y 1
SFX 1105 0 bler's .
SFX 399 Y 1
SFX 399 0 ially .
SFX 2747 Y 1
SFX 2747 0 orers .
SFX 1487 Y 1
SFX 1487 0 ecting .
SFX 1583 Y 1
SFX 1583 0 isability .
SFX 3583 Y 1
SFX 3583 0 wind .
SFX 2052 Y 1
SFX 2052 0 wing .
SFX 2268 Y 1
SFX 2268 0 acts .
SFX 3879 Y 1
SFX 3879 0 ole's .
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 son .
SFX 3577 Y 1
SFX 3577 0 yingly .
SFX 4576 Y 1
SFX 4576 0 sor .
SFX 4489 Y 1
SFX 4489 0 tiles .
SFX 3581 Y 1
SFX 3581 0 wire .
SFX 3220 Y 1
SFX 3220 0 poles .
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 0 ssa .
SFX 3722 Y 1
SFX 3722 0 sse .
SFX 2240 Y 1
SFX 2240 0 ective .
SFX 3663 Y 1
SFX 3663 0 tiveness's .
SFX 2568 Y 1
SFX 2568 0 ancing .
SFX 2187 Y 1
SFX 2187 0 itions .
SFX 4549 Y 1
SFX 4549 0 string .
SFX 4433 Y 1
SFX 4433 0 ualizations .
SFX 2096 Y 1
SFX 2096 0 smanships .
SFX 3959 Y 1
SFX 3959 0 manly .
SFX 3502 Y 1
SFX 3502 0 criptions .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 izer's .
SFX 2497 Y 1
SFX 2497 0 graphers .
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 gers .
SFX 2504 Y 1
SFX 2504 0 gery .
SFX 1549 Y 1
SFX 1549 0 ometer's .
SFX 1985 Y 1
SFX 1985 0 eration .
SFX 3561 Y 1
SFX 3561 0 acy's .
SFX 2997 Y 1
SFX 2997 0 -maker .
