lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Crista/1,49,107,1022,1171,1501,1502
Eve/1,18,27,31,40,179,219,304,531,543,555,1575,1576,1679,1723,1724,1727,2360,2699,3806,4676,4701,4702
Milli/4255,4622
Reno/1,2459
bis/16,101,114,635,1211,1283,1682,2368
die/1,2,3,6,26,48,57,63,76,82,97,119,127,290,2348,2349,3154,3691
diver/131,135,280,392,549,1291,1292,1387,2689,3153,3730,3731,3753,3754,4587
duel/1,2,3,4,9,14,29,46,52,59,67,73,121,168,212,233,326,1146,1314,1721
dust/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,18,32,34,36,50,56,69,72,74,78,90,112,129,258,997,3522,3851,4257,4270,4274,4275,4766
gee/1,2,3,6,84,140,174,227,280,511,528,845,957,1384,2587,2588,3016
grate/2,6,7,13,15,19,93,96,108,122,165,177,205,240,578,1165,1166,1323,1463,1464,1465,1467,1588,1952,2203
gum/1,2,231,237,542,1560,1708,2635,2636,2929,2949,3489,4268,4923,4924
half/1,10,287,444,495,501,553,585,679,986,1184,1509,2735,3567,3840,4336
haw/1,2,3,4,540,732,1202
honey/4261,4280
horse/5,18,50,69,71,78,90,112,122,132,144,252,340,341,375,378,444,501,791,880,1052,1143,1144,1194,1243,1311,1408,1539,1595,1767,2371,3214,3215,3834,4602
inf/9,14,68,94,236,348,426,465,602,1226,1437,1626,1740,1806,1827,1829,1926,1927,2179,2180,2259,2432,2608,2822,2854,2855,3043,3044,3045,3462,3548,3618,3970,4040,4041,4189,4293,4730,4731,4732,4999
inhabit/2,3,4,9,12,35,89,104,226,348,365,426,1626
jitter/2,18,34,36,56,2250,2251,3527
law/1,2,3,4,27,40,50,69,71,78,90,108,164,165,172,177,196,205,240,246,572,684,811,1011,1562,1714,1850,2049,2088,2282,2947,3531,3532,3533,3703
may/2,3,9,38,68,84,100,105,118,236,1027,1220,1243,1252,1595,1766,1767,2028,2222,2375,2749,2899,2953,3220,3221,3239,3860
mids/1247,1248,4260
morph/2,3,4,29,47,65,79,133,162,223,593,638,737,896,1306,1591,2760,4206,4816
new/2,3,4,5,9,10,11,17,26,38,63,76,97,115,146,193,209,219,225,262,293,303,304,363,380,428,430,438,439,508,837,886,934,1116,1284,1285,1377,1499,1500,1620,2547
news/50,464,489,1102,1178,1261,1383,1494,1530,2023,2050,2091,2248,2369,2370,2594,2889,2890,3019,3020,3211,3232,3233,3521,3581,3850,4350
origin/1,2,25,28,89,102,104,137,142,190,241,266,434,473,565,697,796,824,866,978
pest/1,2,9,14,46,52,68,88,125,152,153,156,236,3385,3386,3387,4090
phone/1,2,6,7,18,132,144,163,170,336,411,412,459,637,714,774,900,1038,1431,1561,1701,1742,1960,2145,2759,2999,3255,3256,3257
pig/1,2,42,44,131,135,410,498,521,597,644,645,777,818,819,836,880,933,989,1052,1194,1241,1269,1759,1991,2377,2422,2502,2504,2530,2665,2798,2884,3117,3168,3409,3469,3839,4133,4134,4145
plat/2,3,9,12,14,18,21,29,32,34,36,48,57,82,83,119,127,215,224,829,1264,1302,1418,1442,1443,1444,1695,1696,1783,2003,2241,2509,2750,2751,2897,3435,3436,4221,4340
purvey/2,3,4,100,105,118,365,415,433
rag/1,2,3,4,8,16,21,30,33,51,131,135,194,332,388,529,585,679,977,1048,1179,1262,1818,2595,2596,2598,2599,2824,3335
read/2,3,9,12,14,18,29,32,34,35,36,37,56,72,74,129,186,206,299,332,370,376,388,395,502,529,1210,1396,1913,2420,2911,3490,3813,3945,3946,3947,4185,4186,4223,4917,4918
rob/2,3,4,8,16,21,182,213,221,260,462,499,628,693,2954
scroll/1,2,3,4,35,1622,2554,2958
sister/238,269,270,359,625,715,716,1810,3769
soap/1,2,3,4,9,18,34,36,53,56,74,463,507,569,823,917,1103,1132,1205,1872
spar/179,184,280,312,326,513,540,646,681,788,820,1296,1376,1673,2109,2689,3153,3730,3731,3753,4615
spit/2,3,48,57,82,119,127,568,629,634,694,724,768,1193,1333,1768,2003,2223,2237,2534,2535,3483
suggest/2,3,4,9,12,14,55,60,62,99,173,253,318,431,558,667,855,1088
tender/5,10,11,17,38,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,139,143,244,257,265,271,274,295,964,1268,1979,2046,2490,2491,2492,2583,2882,3438
thick/2,5,9,10,11,17,38,83,115,145,171,197,224,296,297,327,535,551,647,818,821,1201,1269,1294,1992,2234
tit/1,2,9,12,14,46,48,52,57,82,88,110,119,121,124,125,127,153,180,217,278,401,418,437,447,479,500,596,608,634,718,735,768,926,930,931,937,994,1058,1090,1193,1298,1367,1403,1404,1537,1756,1971,2069,3343,3537,4044,4045,4046,4047,4048,4049
tub/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,21,28,29,30,32,33,194,221,260,339,926,1245,1348,1349,1367,2066,2067,2068,4316
whims/18,31,34,36,37,148,214,353,370,2204,3394,4114
your/3756
